Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 State Employees’ Health Insurance Plan

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 49, § 2, effective April 21, 2009, designated the existing Code sections in this article (§§

45-18-1

through

45-18-21

) as Part 1 of this article.

45-18-1.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Health established under Chapter 2 of Title 31.

(1.1)

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community health.

“Employee” means:

A person who works full time for the state and receives his compensation in a direct payment from a department, agency, or institution of state government; provided, however, that such term shall not include specially classified maintenance and food service employees of the Jekyll Island—State Park Authority hired on or after July 1, 1987, and paid on an hourly basis;

An annuitant who at the time of his or her retirement worked full time for the state and received his or her compensation in a direct payment from a department, agency, or institution of state government and who draws a monthly benefit from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the Georgia Judicial Retirement System;

A person who is appointed to an emeritus position under the laws of this state;

Members of the General Assembly;

Administrative and clerical personnel of the General Assembly;

District attorneys of the superior courts of this state;

Assistant district attorneys of the superior courts of this state who are appointed pursuant to Code Section 15-18-14 and district attorneys’ investigators appointed pursuant to Code Section 15-18-14.1;

A person who works full time and receives his compensation in a direct payment from a county board of health or the county boards of health comprising a health district or the county boards of health receiving financial assistance from the Department of Public Health;

An annuitant who at the time of his retirement worked full time and received his compensation in a direct payment from a county board of health or the county boards of health comprising a health district or the county boards of health receiving financial assistance from the Department of Public Health;

A county employee who works full time for a county department of family and children services and who receives his compensation from a county department of family and children services;

An annuitant who at the time of his retirement was a county employee who worked full time for a county department of family and children services and who received his compensation in a direct payment from a county department of family and children services and who draws a monthly benefit from either the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or a county employees’ retirement system;

Secretaries employed by district attorneys and by judges of the superior courts and law clerks employed by judges of the superior courts under Code Sections 15-6-25 through 15-6-28 and Code Sections 15-18-17 through 15-18-19.

“Person who works full time” means an individual who works at least 30 hours per week and whose employment is intended to be a continuing employment. This would exclude any student, seasonal, intermittent, or part-time employment. This would also exclude employment intended for only a very limited duration. Notwithstanding this definition or any other provision of this part, the board may, by regulation, make available to employees who work 17 1/2 hours or more per week such benefits as are required to be made available to such employees by regulations of the United States Internal Revenue Service or any other federal authority.

“Professional claim administrators” means any person, firm, or corporation which has at least two years’ experience in the handling of insurance claims and which the board has determined to be fully qualified, financially sound, and capable of meeting all of the service requirements of the contract of administration under such criteria as may have been established by appropriate rules and regulations promulgated by the board after due notice and hearing as required by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, §§ 1, 2, 6; Ga. L. 1962, p. 51, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 277, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 65, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1506, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1384, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 884, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 667, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 455, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 966, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 425, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1035, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1337, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1148, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 15; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1201, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-4, 1-7/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “this part” was substituted for “this article” in the introductory language of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments regarding Georgia’s insurance laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 117 (1979).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

45-18-2.
Authority to establish health insurance plan; rules and regulations; plan generally; coverage for retiring or retired employees.

The board is authorized to establish a health insurance plan for employees of the state and to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its administration, subject to the limitations contained in this part. The health insurance plan may provide for group hospitalization and surgical and medical insurance against the financial costs of hospitalization, surgery, and medical treatment and care and may also include, among other things, prescribed drugs, medicines, prosthetic appliances, hospital inpatient and outpatient service benefits, dental benefits, vision care benefits, and medical expense indemnity benefits, including major medical benefits.

If a retiring or retired employee or the beneficiary of such retiring or retired employee exercises eligibility under board regulations to continue coverage under the plan and the retiring or retired employees or the beneficiary is eligible to participate in the insurance program operated by or on behalf of the federal government under the provisions of 42 U.S.C.A. 1395, as amended, the coverage available under the health insurance plan shall be subordinated to the coverage available under such federal program. The board is authorized to promulgate regulations to establish the premium paid by the retired employee or beneficiary to reflect the subordination of coverage.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 966, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1148, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

Law reviews.

For article, “Must Government Contractors ‘Submit’ to Their Own Destruction?: Georgia’s Trade Secret Disclosure Exemption and United HealthCare of Georgia, Inc. v. Georgia Department of Community Health,”
see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 825 (2009).

45-18-3.
Design of plan.

The health insurance plan shall be designed by the board to:

Provide a reasonable relationship between the hospital, surgical, and medical benefits to be included and the expected distribution of expenses of each such type to be incurred by the covered employees and dependents; and

Include reasonable controls, which may include deductible and reinsurance provisions applicable to some or all of the benefits, to reduce unnecessary utilization of the various hospital, surgical, and medical services to be provided and to provide reasonable assurance of stability in future years of the plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 5.

45-18-4.
Expenses not to be covered by plan.

The health insurance plan shall not include expenses incurred by or on account of an individual prior to the effective date of the plan; expenses for services received for injury or sickness due to war or any act of war, whether declared or undeclared, which war or act of war shall have occurred after the effective date of this plan; expenses for which the individual is not required to make payment; expenses to the extent of benefits provided under any employer group plan other than this plan in which the state participates in the cost thereof; expenses for abortion services except to the extent permitted under the state health benefit plan approved by the board as such plan existed on January 1, 2014; and such other expenses as may be excluded by regulations of the board. For purposes of this Code section, the term “abortion” shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 31-9A-2.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 966, § 2; Ga. L. 2014, p. 349, § 2/SB 98.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 21, 2014, inserted “expenses for abortion services except to the extent permitted under the state health benefit plan approved by the board as such plan existed on January 1, 2014;” near the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 349, § 3/SB 98, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The General Assembly, by joint resolution, may appoint one or more of its members who sponsored or cosponsored this Act in his or her official capacity to intervene as a matter of right in any case in which the constitutionality of this Act or any portion thereof is challenged.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 177 (2014).

45-18-4.1.
Breast cancer screening for individuals with high risk.

As used in this Code section, the term “individual with a high risk for breast cancer” means an individual:

With a lifetime risk of breast cancer of 20 percent or greater as according to a risk assessment tool based primarily on family history, such as but not limited to, the Tyrer-Cuzick Version 8.0b model;

With a known BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutation based on genetic testing;

Who has not had genetic testing, but has a first-degree relative with a BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutation;

Who has had radiation therapy to the chest between ten and 30 years of age; and

Who has Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Cowden syndrome, or Bannayan-Riley-Ruvalcaba syndrome or has a first-degree relative who has any such syndrome.

The health insurance plan established pursuant to this article shall include coverage for breast cancer screening for individuals with a high risk for breast cancer who are 30 years of age or older. Such breast cancer screening coverage shall include:

An annual mammogram or digital breast tomosynthesis; and

An annual breast magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scan or appropriate alternative advanced screening study, such as but not limited to, whole breast ultrasound, if the individual is unable to undergo such breast magnetic resonance imaging (MRI).

The department shall collect nonidentifying data on the number of individuals in the health insurance plan established pursuant to this article who are determined to be individuals with a high risk for breast cancer pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 796, § 3/HB 1125.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 796, § 1/HB 1125, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Lacee’s Law.’ ”

45-18-5.
County officers and employees.

The board is authorized to contract with the various counties of this state for the inclusion of the employees of any county within any health insurance plan or plans established under this part. The various counties of this state are authorized to contract with the board as provided in this Code section. In the event that any such contract is entered into, it shall be the duty of any counties so contracting to deduct from the salary or other compensation of its employees such payment as may be required under any health insurance plan and to remit the same to the board for inclusion in the health insurance fund. In addition, it shall be the duty of such county or counties to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should such county or counties fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions, the commissioner may, upon written notice to such county or counties, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

County officials may elect to be included in a health insurance plan, health maintenance organization, or other health benefits plan offered or provided by a county for its county officials or any health plan or plans established under this part. The governing authority of a county may elect by majority vote to provide for payment in a uniform manner of any portion, all, or none of the employer contributions for or required premiums or payments due from the county officials or former county officials who under this Code section are eligible for inclusion in the health plan or plans established under this part. The board is authorized to contract with the County Officers Association of Georgia on behalf of the various counties of this state for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of officials, spouses, and dependents of officials serving in one or more of the following capacities: probate judge, sheriff, tax commissioner or tax collector, clerk of the superior court, full-time or part-time state court judge, solicitor, state court clerk, or solicitor-general, chief magistrate, juvenile court judge, or members of the county governing authority and officials, spouses, and dependents of officials leaving office on or after December 31, 1996, who have served at least 12 years in one or more of the following capacities: probate judge, sheriff, tax commissioner or tax collector, clerk of the superior court, full-time or part-time state court judge, solicitor, state court clerk, or solicitor-general, chief magistrate, juvenile court judge, or members of the county governing authority. The County Officers Association of Georgia is authorized to contract with the board as provided in this Code section. In the event that such a contract is entered into, it shall be the duty of the County Officers Association of Georgia to collect from the various counties of this state with which it has contracted under this subsection and remit to the board such payment as may be required under any health insurance plan for inclusion in the health insurance fund. The County Officers Association of Georgia may add a reasonable fee to the premiums required under the plan to cover necessary administrative costs. In addition, it shall be the duty of the County Officers Association of Georgia to maintain and remit to the board accurate records of official, dependent, and other information required by the board to administer this Code section. Should the County Officers Association of Georgia fail to remit such payment, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the County Officers Association of Georgia, terminate the coverage for such officials as of the day following the last day for which such payment was remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

The various counties of this state are authorized to contract with the County Officers Association of Georgia for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of officials, spouses, and dependents of officials serving in one or more of the following capacities: probate judge, sheriff, tax commissioner or tax collector, clerk of the superior court, full-time or part-time state court judge, solicitor, or solicitor-general, chief magistrate, juvenile court judge, or members of the county governing authority and officials, spouses, and dependents of officials leaving office on or after December 31, 1996, who have served at least 12 years in one or more of the following capacities: probate judge, sheriff, tax commissioner or tax collector, clerk of the superior court, full-time or part-time state court judge, solicitor, state court clerk, or solicitor-general, chief magistrate, juvenile court judge, or members of the county governing authority. The County Officers Association of Georgia is authorized to contract with the various counties of the state as provided in this Code section. In the event that any such contracts are entered into, it shall be the duty of any counties so contracting to deduct from the salary or other compensation of its officials and otherwise collect from former officials such payment as may be required under any health insurance plan and to remit the same to the County Officers Association of Georgia for payment to the board. To the extent employer contributions are not fully made by a county, it shall be the duty of the covered officials and former officials to make such employer contributions required on their behalf for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the County Officers Association of Georgia fail to remit such payment, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the County Officers Association of Georgia, terminate the coverage for such officials as of the day following the last day for which such payment was remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

(c.1)

Any local board of education may elect for members thereof and their spouses and dependents to be included in any health plan or plans established under Code Section 20-2-918. It shall be the duty of any local boards of education so electing to deduct from the salary or other compensation of its members such payment as may be required under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-55 and to remit the same to the health insurance fund created under Code Section 20-2-918. Should any local board of education fail to remit such payment to the board, the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-920 shall be applicable to such nonpayment.

In administering this Code section, it shall be the responsibility of the board to develop rates for coverage based on the actual claims experience of the individuals covered by this Code section. The board shall require a bond satisfactory to the commissioner to assure the contractual performance of any entities with which it contracts under this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall preclude the exercise of any options or rights otherwise available to such county officers or members of local boards of education under other state or federal laws which relate to extension or continuation of health benefits.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 726, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 857, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 45; Ga. L. 1999, p. 813, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1071, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 841, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 1/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, punctuation was revised in subsections (b) and (c) and “Code” was capitalized in the last sentence of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 813, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing herein shall be construed to allow county officials or local school board officials to be included in the state employee’s health insurance plan except that the appropriate agencies of state government may provide administrative services, only, for county officials and local school officials participating in various plans.”

45-18-5.1.
Licensed blind or otherwise seriously disabled vendors.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized to contract with the Georgia Cooperative Services for the Blind, Inc., a nominee agent designated by the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, for the inclusion of licensed blind persons or other persons with disabilities operating a vending facility in accordance with Article 2 of Chapter 9 of Chapter 49 within any health insurance plan or plans established under this part. In the event any contract is entered into, it shall be the duty of the Georgia Cooperative Services for the Blind, Inc., to deduct the payment required under the plan from the earnings or other compensation of licensed blind persons or other persons with disabilities and remit it to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency for inclusion in the health insurance fund. In addition, it shall be the duty of the Georgia Cooperative Services for the Blind, Inc., to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the Georgia Cooperative Services for the Blind, Inc., fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions through the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, the board may, upon written notice to the Georgia Cooperative Services for the Blind, Inc., terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 833, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 7; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 2/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, §§ 3, 7/HB 1146.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Article 2” was substituted for “Article 3” in the first sentence.

45-18-5.2.
Sheltered employment center employees.

The board is authorized to contract with public and private nonprofit sheltered employment centers which contract with or employ persons within the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for the inclusion of employees working in the sheltered employment centers within any health insurance plan or plans established under this part. The board is authorized to adopt regulations for entering into any contract. In the event any contract is entered into, it shall be the duty of the sheltered employment center to remit any funds that may be deducted from the earnings or other compensation of such sheltered employees for inclusion in the health insurance fund. In addition, it shall be the duty of the sheltered employment center to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the sheltered employment center fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the sheltered employment center, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-5.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 720, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-21; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 3/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 3/HB 1146.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” was substituted for “Mental Health and Mental Retardation” in the first sentence.

45-18-6.
Contracts to provide insurance benefits; invitation of proposals; reinsurance agreements; issuance of certificates of coverage; redetermination of contracts; self-insurance plans; contracts for administrative services; contracts with health maintenance organizations.

The board is authorized to execute a contract or contracts to provide the benefits under the plan of health insurance benefits determined upon in accordance with this part. Such contract or contracts may be executed with one or more corporations licensed to transact accident and health insurance business in this state. All of the benefits to be provided under this part may be included in one or more similar contracts or the benefits may be classified into different types, with each type included under one or more similar contracts issued by the same or different companies. A reasonable time before entering into any insurance contract provided for in this Code section, the board shall invite proposals from such qualified insurers as in the opinion of the board would desire to accept any part of the insurance coverage authorized by this part.

The board may arrange with any corporation licensed to transact accident and health insurance business in this state, which corporation issued any such contract, to reinsure portions of such contract with any other such corporation which elected to be a reinsurer and is legally competent to enter into a reinsurance agreement. The board may designate one or more of such corporations as the administering corporation or corporations. Each employee who is covered under any such contract or contracts shall receive a certificate setting forth the benefits to which the employee and his dependents are entitled thereunder, stating to whom such benefits shall be payable, stating to whom claims should be submitted, and summarizing the provisions of the contract principally affecting the employee and his dependents. Such certificate shall be in lieu of the certificate which the corporation or corporations issuing such contract or contracts would otherwise issue. The corporations eligible to participate as reinsurers, and the amount of coverage under the contract or contracts to be allocated to each issuing corporation or reinsurer, may be redetermined by the board for and in advance of any contract year after the first year and with any modifications thereof it deems appropriate to carry out the intent of reinsuring portions of the coverage, subject to such limitations as set forth in this part. At the end of any contract year the board may discontinue any contract or contracts it has executed with any corporation or corporations and replace it or them with a contract or contracts with any other corporation or corporations meeting the requirements of this Code section; or the board may, at its discretion, establish a self-insured plan in whole or in part.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, the board is authorized to execute a contract or contracts with one or more insurers authorized to transact accident and sickness insurance in this state or with one or more health care corporations or with one or more professional claim administrators authorized or licensed to transact business in this state or with one or more independent adjusting firms with employees who are licensed as independent adjusters pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 23 of Title 33 to provide administrative services in connection with a self-insured health insurance plan for state employees.

The board may contract with any health maintenance organization qualified to conduct business in this state pursuant to Chapter 21 of Title 33, relating to health maintenance organizations, which organization provides evidence that it is qualified to operate as a health maintenance organization in accordance with the rules and regulations issued by the secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services of the United States; or the board may contract with any other corporation licensed under Title 33, which corporation is authorized by law to provide the same types of benefits which are provided by such health maintenance organizations.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1384, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 884, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 966, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 45; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2017, p. 164, § 58/HB 127.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted “hospital service nonprofit corporations, nonprofit medical service corporations, or” preceding “health care corporations” in the middle of subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article, “Must Government Contractors ‘Submit’ to Their Own Destruction?: Georgia’s Trade Secret Disclosure Exemption and United HealthCare of Georgia, Inc. v. Georgia Department of Community Health,”
see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 825 (2009).

45-18-6.1.
Reimbursement rates offered under state employees’ health insurance plan.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Federally qualified health center” means an entity which meets the definition of a federally qualified health center as described in 42 U.S.C. Section 1905(l)(2)(B).

“Medicare” means coverage under both Parts A and B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1395, et seq., as amended.

“State health benefit plan” means the health insurance plan or plans established pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 and Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 for state and public employees, dependents, and retirees.

On and after January 1, 2020, any contracts entered into or renewed by the department for health care coverage for enrollees under the state health benefit plan shall include payment for services furnished to enrollees by federally qualified health centers in an amount no less than the then applicable Medicare maximum allowable reimbursement rate to federally qualified health centers for any such service.

This Code section shall not apply to any licensed group model health maintenance organization with an exclusive medical contract.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 222, § 1/SB 184.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

45-18-7.
Retiring employees, spouses, and dependents.

The contract or contracts shall provide for health insurance for retiring state employees and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board, on such terms as the board may deem appropriate; and the board may authorize the inclusion in the plan of the employees and retiring employees of state authorities covered by the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board. Any state authority participating in the plan shall be required to pay the same rate of contribution paid by the state. The board shall adopt regulations prescribing the conditions under which an employee or retiring employee may elect to participate in or withdraw from the plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 147, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1005, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1473, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-98/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted the subsection (a) designation; and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Employees of the state-wide probation system administered by the Department of Corrections who were employees of a county probation system of a county having a population of 800,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 2000 or any future such census and who were members of a local retirement system and had ten or more years of creditable service under the local retirement system at the time the county probation system became a part of the state-wide probation system shall be eligible to continue coverage under the health insurance plan for the state employees upon retirement from a local retirement system by paying a premium set by the board. Such retired persons shall be eligible to enroll their spouses and eligible dependents in accordance with the regulations of the board. Such retirees shall be treated in the same manner as other retirees eligible to continue coverage under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. The board may promulgate and adopt rules and regulations governing continuance and discontinuance of coverage for such retired persons and their spouses and eligible dependents.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

45-18-7.1.
Employees of the Georgia Development Authority.

The board is authorized to contract with the Georgia Development Authority for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of the employees and retiring employees of the Georgia Development Authority and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board. It shall be the duty of the Georgia Development Authority to deduct from the salary or other remuneration of its employees such payment as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of the Georgia Development Authority to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the Georgia Development Authority fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the Georgia Development Authority, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 4/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

45-18-7.2.
[Reserved] Agrirama Development Authority employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 662, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 5/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45(6)/HB 142, effective May 13, 2011.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 45(6)/HB 142 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective May 13, 2011.

45-18-7.3.
Employees of Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, and Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, spouses, and dependent children.

The board is authorized to contract with the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, and the Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of the employees and retiring employees of said Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, and Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board. It shall be the duty of said Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, and Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia to deduct from the salary or other remuneration of their employees such payment as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of said Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, and Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, or Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund, or Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, as the case may be, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-7.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 766, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 857, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1375, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 6/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 45/HB 1428.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund” for “Peace Officers’ Annuity Benefit Fund” in the second sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “of Georgia” was deleted following “Benefit Fund” near the beginning of the first sentence.

45-18-7.4.
[Reserved] Employees of Hazardous Waste Management Authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 490, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45, effective April 18, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 18, 2002.

45-18-7.5.
Employees of Georgia Housing and Finance Authority, spouses, and dependent children.

The board is authorized to contract with the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of the employees and retiring employees of the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board. It shall be the duty of the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority to deduct from the salary or other remuneration or otherwise collect such payment from its qualified employees, retired employees, or dependents as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-7.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 7/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

45-18-7.6.
Employees of Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service, spouses, and dependent children.

The board is authorized to contract with the Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service for the inclusion in any health insurance plan or plans established under this part of the state employees of, retiring employees of, and employees who retired under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on or before July 1, 2000, from the Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service and their spouses and dependent children, as defined by the regulations of the board. It shall be the duty of the Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service to deduct from the salary or other remuneration or otherwise collect such payment from its qualified employees or dependents as may be required under the board’s regulations. In addition, it shall be the duty of the Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service to make the employer contributions required for the operation of such plan or plans. Should the Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service fail to remit such deductions or such employer contributions to the board, the commissioner may, upon written notice to the Georgia-Federal State Inspection Service, terminate the coverage for such employees as of the day following the last day for which such deductions or such employer contributions were remitted to the board. Coverage may be reinstated upon the tender of any such deductions or employer contributions not previously remitted.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-7.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1411, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1032, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 188, § 8/HB 1372; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 45/HB 1387.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 270 (2001).